Massachusetts, session 194th, H776.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 19A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 44. For the purposes of administering the federal Older Americans Act of 1965
and subsequent amendments thereto, the term "greatest social need", as defined in 42 U.S.C.
3002(24), shall mean the need caused by non-economic factors that restrict an individual's ability
to perform normal daily tasks or that threaten the individual’s capacity to live independently.
These factors shall include, but are not limited to, physical or mental disability, language barriers
and cultural or social isolation caused by, among other things, racial and ethnic status, sexual
orientation, gender identity or expression or HIV status.
of 1